Maryland, session 2025, HB1045.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health – General
4–301.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(j) “Legally protected health care” means all [reproductive] SENSITIVE health
services, medications, and supplies related to:
(1) The provision of abortion care; and
(2) [Other] REPRODUCTIVE HEALTH AND OTHER sensitive health
services as determined by the Secretary based on the recommendations of the Protected
Health Care Commission established under § 4–310 of this subtitle.
(r) “Sensitive health services” includes [reproductive]:
(1) REPRODUCTIVE health services other than abortion care; AND
(2) GENDER–AFFIRMING CARE.
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 469
13–3401.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Family planning providers” means providers of services:
(1) Funded under Title X of the federal Public Health Service Act as of
December 31, [2016] 2024; and
(2) That lost eligibility for Title X funding as a result of the termination of
federal funding for providers because of:
(i) The scope of services offered by the providers; [or]
(ii) The scope of services for which the providers offer referrals,
COUNSELING, OR OTHER ACTIONS DESCRIBED IN RULES ESTABLISHED BY THE U.S.
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES; OR
(III) THE PROVISIONS OF FUNDING OR GRANTS TO ENTITIES OF
PROVIDERS DESCRIBED IN ITEM (I) OR (II) OF THIS ITEM.
(c) “Family planning services” means services provided under Title X of the
federal Public Health Service Act as of December 31, [2016] 2024.
(d) “Program” means the Family Planning Program established under § 13–3402
of this subtitle.
13–3402.
(a) There is a Family Planning Program in the Department.
(b) The purpose of the Program is to ensure the continuity of family planning
services in the State.
(c) The Program shall provide family planning services to individuals who are
eligible for family planning services through family planning providers that meet Program
requirements.
(d) The Department may adopt regulations to implement this subtitle, including
regulations establishing a sliding scale fee for services provided under the Program.
(e) Funding used to support family planning services under the Program shall be
in addition to any funding applied by the Department before December 31, [2016] 2024, to
the maintenance of effort requirement for federal funding under Title X of the federal Public
Health Service Act.
– 3 –

Ch. 469 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(f) (1) The Department may not accept any federal funding under Title X of
the federal Public Health Service Act if the Title X program:
(i) Excludes family planning providers; and
(ii) Does not require family planning providers to provide a broad
range of acceptable and effective medically approved family planning methods and services.
(2) If the Department does not accept Title X program funds in accordance
with paragraph (1) of this subsection, the Governor shall fund the Program with State
funds at the same level of total funds provided to the Program in the immediately preceding
fiscal year.
15–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(h) “Program” means the Maryland Medical Assistance Program.
15–102.1.
(b) The Department shall, to the extent permitted, subject to the limitations of
the State budget:
(6) Ensure access to and the continuity of services provided by family
planning providers that were family planning providers in the Program as of December 31,
[2016] 2024, and were discontinued as recipients of federal funding under federal law or
regulation because of the scope of services offered by the provider or the scope of services
for which the provider offered referrals, by:
(i) Reimbursing for the Program services provided; and
(ii) Establishing Program requirements for the family planning
providers that:
1. Are similar to the requirements for other providers of the
same services;
2. Do not prohibit a provider from offering a service if the
service is within the scope of practice of the provider as established under the Health
Occupations Article; and
3. Do not limit the scope of services for which a provider may
offer referrals;
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 469
Article – Insurance
2–202.
(a) (1) Notwithstanding any other law and except as provided in paragraph (2)
of this subsection, the Commissioner has exclusive jurisdiction to enforce by administrative
action the laws of the State that relate to the underwriting or rate–setting practices of an
insurer.
(2) The Commission on Civil Rights has concurrent jurisdiction with the
Commissioner:
(I) over alleged discrimination on the basis of race, creed, color, or
national origin; AND
(II) FOR THE ENFORCEMENT OF § 15–1A–22 OF THIS ARTICLE.
15–1A–01.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(e) “Grandfathered plan” means a health benefit plan that:
(1) meets the criteria established under 45 C.F.R. § 147.140 and any
corresponding federal rules and guidance as those provisions were in effect [December 1,
2023] DECEMBER 31, 2024; or
(2) if the Commissioner adopts regulations as described in § 15–1A–03 of
this subtitle, meets the criteria established by the adopted regulations.
15–1A–03.
(a) For purposes of this subtitle, to the extent necessary, the Commissioner shall
adopt regulations that:
(1) establish criteria that a health benefit plan must meet to be considered
a grandfathered plan; and
(2) are consistent with 45 C.F.R. § 147.140 and any corresponding federal
rules and guidance as those provisions were in effect [December 1, 2023] DECEMBER 31,
2024.
15–1A–04.
For purposes of this subtitle, to the extent necessary, the Commissioner shall adopt
regulations that:
– 5 –

Ch. 469 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(1) establish criteria that a health benefit plan must meet to be considered
a health benefit plan that covers essential health benefits; and
(2) are consistent with 45 C.F.R. Part 156 Subpart B and any
corresponding federal rules and guidance as those provisions were in effect [December 1,
2023] DECEMBER 31, 2024.
15–1A–15.
(c) To the extent necessary, the Commissioner, in consultation with the Maryland
Health Benefit Exchange, shall adopt regulations that:
(1) establish standards for the summary of benefits and coverage; and
(2) are consistent with 45 C.F.R. § 147.200 and any corresponding federal
rules and guidance in effect [December 1, 2019] DECEMBER 31, 2024.
15–1A–16.
(a) (1) For purposes of this section, “medical loss ratio”:
(i) has the meaning established in 45 C.F.R. § 158.221; or
(ii) if the Commissioner adopts regulations as described in
paragraph (2) of this subsection, has the meaning established by the adopted regulations.
(2) To the extent necessary, the Commissioner shall adopt regulations that:
(i) establish a definition for “medical loss ratio”; and
(ii) are consistent with 45 C.F.R. § 158.221 and any corresponding
federal rules and guidance as those provisions were in effect [December 1, 2023]
DECEMBER 31, 2024.
(e) To the extent necessary, the Commissioner shall adopt regulations that:
(1) establish requirements for calculating medical loss ratios and related
reporting and rebate requirements; and
(2) are consistent with 45 C.F.R. Part 158 and any corresponding federal
rules and guidance as those provisions were in effect [December 1, 2023] DECEMBER 31,
2024.
15–1A–18.
– 6 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 469
(d) To the extent necessary, the Maryland Health Benefit Exchange shall adopt
regulations that:
(1) establish a process for issuing hardship exemptions and affordability
exemptions; and
(2) are consistent with 42 U.S.C. § 5000A and any corresponding federal
rules and guidance as those provisions were in effect [December 1, 2019] DECEMBER 31,
2024.
15–1A–19.
(c) To the extent necessary, the Commissioner shall adopt regulations that:
(1) establish annual limitations on cost–sharing; and
(2) are consistent with 45 C.F.R. § 156.130 and any corresponding federal
rules and guidance as those provisions were in effect [December 1, 2019] DECEMBER 31,
2024.
15–1A–20.
(c) To the extent necessary, the Commissioner shall adopt regulations that:
(1) establish criteria to determine whether an individual plan or a small
group plan provides prescription drug essential health benefit coverage; and
(2) are consistent with 45 C.F.R. § 156.122 and any corresponding federal
rules and guidance as those provisions were in effect [December 1, 2019] DECEMBER 31,
2024.
15–1A–21.
(c) To the extent necessary, the Commissioner shall adopt regulations that:
(1) establish requirements that a carrier shall comply with to rescind
coverage under subsection (b) of this section; and
(2) are consistent with 45 C.F.R. § 147.128 and any federal rules and
guidance as those provisions were in effect [December 1, 2019] DECEMBER 31, 2024.
15–1A–22.
(e) The COMMISSIONER AND THE Commission on Civil Rights shall enforce the
provisions of this section as provided for in § 2–202 of this article.
– 7 –

Ch. 469 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(F) THE COMMISSIONER MAY ADOPT REGULATIONS NECESSARY TO CARRY
OUT THIS SECTION CONSISTENT WITH FEDERAL STATUTES, RULES, AND GUIDANCE
IN EFFECT ON DECEMBER 31, 2024.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 13, 2025.
– 8 –